District of Columbia statutes.
7-1207.01

Civil liability.

(a)

Except for violations of § 7-1205.05(a), any person who negligently violates the provisions of this chapter shall be liable in an amount equal to the damages sustained by the client plus the costs of the action and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(b)

Except for violations of § 7-1205.05(a), any person who willfully or intentionally violates the provisions of this chapter shall be liable in damages sustained by the client in an amount not less than $1,000 plus the costs of the action and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(c)

Either party is entitled to trial by jury, upon request.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 701, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2061.
1973 Ed., § 6-1641.